Missouri, session 2026, HB2298.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 523.039, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 523.039, to read as follows:
523.039. 1. In all eminent domain proceedings filed after December 31, 2006, just
compensation for condemned property shall be determined under one of the three following
subdivisions, whichever yields the highest compensation, as applicable to the particular type
of property and taking:
(1) An amount equivalent to the fair market value of such property;
(2) For condemnations that result in a homestead taking, an amount equivalent to the
fair market value of such property multiplied by one hundred twenty-five percent; or
(3) For condemnations of property that result in any taking that prevents the owner
from utilizing property in substantially the same manner as it was currently being utilized on
the day of the taking and involving property owned within the same family for fifty or more
years, an amount equivalent to the sum of the fair market value and heritage value. For the
purposes of this subdivision, family ownership of property may be established through
evidence of ownership by children, grandchildren, siblings, or nephews or nieces of the
family member owning the property fifty years prior to the taking; and in addition, may be
established through marriage or adoption by such family members. If any entity owns the
real property, members of the family shall have an ownership interest in more than fifty
percent of the entity in order to be within the family line of ownership for the purposes of this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2298 2
subdivision. The property owner shall have the burden of proving to the commissioners or
court that the property has been owned within the same family for fifty or more years.
2. For eminent domain proceedings of any agricultural or horticultural property by an
electrical corporation as defined in section 386.020[, except for an electrical corporation
operating under a cooperative business plan as described in section 393.110,] for the purposes
of constructing an electric plant subject to a certificate of convenience and necessity under
subsection 1 of section 393.170 or by an electrical corporation operating under a
cooperative business plan as described in subsection 2 of section 393.110, just
compensation shall be an amount equivalent to fair market value multiplied by one
hundred fifty percent, as determined by the court. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply to applications filed pursuant to section 393.170 prior to August 28, 2022.
✔